Mississippi, session 2026, SB2053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this subsection, unless context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Voting precinct" means one (1) of several districts into which a county or municipality is divided for voting. (b)  "Polling place" means the place within a precinct where electors vote. (2)  All county or municipality governments shall provide the Secretary of State with information regarding the location of each polling place within their precinct(s), at least ninety (90) days before any general, primary or special elections.  If there are any changes to polling place locations for any reason, the county or municipal government shall provide the updated location(s) to the Secretary of State's office. (3)  The Secretary of State's office shall mail out postcards to all registered voters with their polling place location information at least thirty (30) days prior to any general, primary or special election.  If a polling place location is changed less than thirty (30) days before a general, primary or special election, then the postcards shall be sent as soon as possible by certified mail. (4)  The Secretary of State shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations regarding the formatting of the postcards required by this section. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-281, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-281.  (1)  Each county shall be divided into supervisors districts, which shall be the same as those for the election of members of the board of supervisors, and may be subdivided thereafter into voting precincts; and there shall be only one (1) voting place in each voting precinct.  The board of supervisors shall notify the Office of the Secretary of State of the boundary of each supervisors district, sub-precinct and voting precinct as then fixed and shall provide the office a legal description and a map of each supervisors district, sub-precinct and voting precinct and shall indicate the voting place in each such district, as required by Section 1 of this act.  The board of supervisors shall also ensure the legal description and map of each supervisors district is available in the circuit clerk's office for public inspection. (2)  The board of supervisors is authorized, by order spread upon the minutes of the board setting forth the cost and source of funds therefor, to purchase improved or unimproved property and to construct, reconstruct, repair, renovate and maintain polling places, or to pay to private property owners reasonable rental fees when the property is used as a polling place for a period not to exceed the day immediately preceding the election, the day of the election, and the day immediately following the election.  The location of a polling place shall not be altered within sixty (60) days of any primary, general, runoff or special election unless exigent circumstances exist.  If the board of supervisors finds that exigent circumstances exist where a polling place needs to be altered within sixty (60) days of an election, then their reasons for making that decision shall be spread upon the minutes at their next scheduled meeting.  When the location of a polling place is altered within sixty (60) days of an election, in addition to the requirements of Section 1 of this act, public notice of the change shall be posted at city hall, the courthouse, the registrar's office, the previous polling place location if it is a public building, and for three (3) consecutive weeks, or each week before the election if the alteration happens within three (3) weeks of the election, in a newspaper that is circulated in the area.  On or before May 1, 2019, the county board of supervisors shall ensure each polling place is accessible to all voters, structurally sound, capable of providing air conditioning and heating and compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act. (3)  All facilities owned or leased by the state, county, municipality, or school district may be made available at no cost to the board of supervisors for use as polling places to such extent as may be agreed to by the authority having control or custody of these facilities. SECTION 3.  Section 23-15-557, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-557.  The governing authorities of any municipality within the State of Mississippi are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to divide the municipality into a sufficient number of voting precincts of such size and location as is necessary, and there shall be the same number of polling places.  The authority conducting an election shall not be required, however, to establish a polling place in each of said precincts, but such election authorities, whether in a primary or in a general election, may locate and establish such polling places, without regard to precinct lines, in such manner as in the discretion of such authority will better accommodate the electorate and better facilitate the holding of the election.  The location of a polling place shall not be altered within sixty (60) days of any primary, general, runoff or special election unless exigent circumstances exist.  The governing authority of every municipality shall report the location of the established polling place within their voting precinct(s) as required by Section 1 of this act.  If the governing authorities find that exigent circumstances exist where a polling place needs to be altered within sixty (60) days of an election, then their reasons for making that decision shall be spread upon the minutes at their next scheduled meeting.  When the location of a polling place is altered within sixty (60) days of an election, in addition to the requirements of Section 1 of this act, public notice of the change shall be posted at city hall, the courthouse, the registrar's office, the previous polling place location if it is a public building, and for three (3) consecutive weeks, or each week before the election if the alteration happens within three (3) weeks of the election in a newspaper that is circulated in the area. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.